Florida, session 2026, SB1674.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsection (16) of section 1001.42, Florida 20 Statutes, is amended to read: 21 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 22 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 23 powers and perform all duties listed below: 24 (16)âSCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM.â 25 (a)âAssume such responsibilities and exercise such powers 26 and perform such duties as may be assigned to it by law or as 27 may be required by rules of the Department of Agriculture and 28 Consumer Services or, as in the opinion of the district school 29 board, are necessary to ensure school lunch services, consistent 30 with needs of students; effective and efficient operation of the 31 program; and the proper articulation of the school lunch program 32 with other phases of education in the district. 33 (b)âEach school district shall require each school within 34 the district to participate in the National School Lunch Program 35 and the School Breakfast Program. Each school shall make: 36 1.âLunch available pursuant to the National School Lunch 37 Program, regardless of whether a student has the money to pay 38 for the lunch or owes money for meals previously provided. A 39 school district may collect payment for meals provided pursuant 40 to this paragraph. However, a school district may not use a 41 third-party debt collector to collect such debt. 42 2.âBreakfast available pursuant to the National School 43 Breakfast Program at no cost to the student unless the studentâs 44 parent has provided written notification to the school to 45 withhold such meal from the student. The Department of 46 Agriculture and Consumer Services shall reimburse each school 47 district for each school breakfast served to a student, with a 48 maximum of one breakfast per student per school day. The 49 reimbursement rate shall be the difference between the amount 50 paid by the United States Department of Agriculture and the free 51 rate set annually by the United States Secretary of Agriculture 52 for each school. 53 (c)âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may 54 adopt rules to administer this subsection. 55 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.